Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 2 Incorporation

7-1.2-201.
Incorporators and organization of the corporation.

One or more individuals may act as incorporator or incorporators of a corporation by filing articles of incorporation for the corporation with the secretary of state.

After incorporation:

If initial directors are named in the articles of incorporation, the initial directors shall hold an organizational meeting, at the call of a majority of the directors, to complete the organization of the corporation by appointing officers, adopting bylaws, and transacting on any other business to come before the meeting.

If initial directors are not named in the articles of incorporation, the incorporator or incorporators shall hold an organizational meeting at the call of the majority of the incorporators:

To elect directors and complete the organization of the corporation; or

To elect a board of directors who will complete the organization of the corporation.

The incorporator or incorporators calling a meeting under this section shall give at least three (3) days’ notice of the meeting by mail to each incorporator. The notice must state the time and place of the meeting.

The act or decision done or made by a majority of the incorporators are the act of the incorporators, provided that an action permitted to be taken at the meeting or meetings of incorporators under this section may be taken without a meeting if a consent, in writing, stating the action to be taken, is signed by all of the incorporators.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2.

7-1.2-202.
Articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation must state:

A corporate name that satisfies the requirements of §

7-1.2-401

.

The total number of shares which the corporation has authority to issue, and if the corporation is to be authorized to issue more than one class of shares:

The total number of shares of each class; and

A statement of all or any of the designations and the powers, preferences, and rights, including voting rights, and the qualifications, limitations, or restrictions of them, which are permitted by the provisions of this chapter in respect of any class or classes of shares of the corporation and the fixing of which by the articles of incorporation is desired, and an express grant of the authority as it may then be desired to grant to the board of directors to fix by vote or votes any of them that may be desired but which is not fixed by the articles.

The address of its initial registered office, and the name of its initial registered agent at the address.

The name and address of each incorporator.

The articles of incorporation may state:

A par value of authorized shares or classes of shares.

Any provisions electing to provide preemptive rights to shareholders pursuant to the provisions of §

7-1.2-613

.

Any provision, not inconsistent with law, which the incorporators elect to set forth in the articles of incorporation for the regulation of the internal affairs of the corporation, including, but not limited to, a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or to its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of the director’s duty as a director; provided that the provision does not eliminate or limit the liability of a director for:

Any breach of the director’s duty of loyalty to the corporation or its shareholders;

Acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

Liability imposed pursuant to the provisions of §

7-1.2-811

; or

Any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit (unless the transaction is permitted by §

7-1.2-807

). No provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director will be effective with respect to causes of action arising prior to the inclusion of the provision in the articles of incorporation of the corporation.

Any provision which under this chapter is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws.

If, pursuant to §

7-1.2-105(d)

, the corporate existence is to begin at a time subsequent to the issuance of the certificate of incorporation by the secretary of state, the date when corporate existence begins.

The provisions permitted by subsection (b)(3) may also be included in the articles of incorporation or legislative charter of any existing or future financial institution, insurance company, public utility, or other quasi public corporation having purposes enumerated as exceptions to this chapter in §

7-1.2-301

.

The period of duration of a corporation is perpetual unless otherwise stated in the articles of incorporation.

It is not necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation any of the corporate powers enumerated in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 188, § 1.

7-1.2-203.
Bylaws.

The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of the corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation. The initial bylaws of a corporation must be adopted by its incorporators or by its board of directors at its organization meeting. Subsequently, the bylaws may be amended by the shareholders, or, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, by the board of directors, but any amendment to the bylaws by the board of directors may be changed by the shareholders.

Emergency bylaws.

The board of directors of any corporation may adopt emergency bylaws, subject to repeal or change by action of the shareholders, which are, notwithstanding any different provision elsewhere in this chapter or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, operative during any emergency in the conduct of the business of the corporation resulting from an attack on the United States or any nuclear or atomic disaster. The emergency bylaws may make any provision that may be practical and necessary for the circumstances of the emergency, including provisions that:

A meeting of the board of directors may be called by any officer or director in any manner and under conditions prescribed in the emergency bylaws;

The director or directors in attendance at the meeting, or any greater number fixed by the emergency bylaws, constitutes a quorum; and

The officers or other individuals designated on a list approved by the board of directors before the emergency, all in the order of priority and subject to the conditions, and for a period of time (not longer than reasonably necessary after the termination of the emergency) that may be provided in the emergency bylaws or in the resolution approving the list, are, to the extent required to provide a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors, deemed directors for the meeting.

The board of directors, either before or during any emergency, may provide, and from time to time modify, lines of succession in the event that during an emergency any or all officers or agents of the corporation are for any reason rendered incapable of discharging their duties.

The board of directors, either before or during any emergency, may, effective in the emergency, change the head office or designate several alternative head offices or regional offices, or authorize the officers so to do.

To the extent not inconsistent with any adopted emergency bylaws, the bylaws of the corporation remain in effect during any emergency, and upon its termination the emergency bylaws cease to be operative.

Unless otherwise provided in emergency bylaws, notice of any meeting of the board of directors during any emergency may be given only to those directors that it may be feasible to reach at the time and by any means that may be feasible at the time, including publication or radio.

To the extent required to constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board of directors during any emergency, the officers of the corporation who are present are, unless otherwise provided in emergency bylaws, deemed, in order of rank and within the same rank in order of seniority, directors for the meeting.

No officer, director, or employee acting in accordance with any emergency bylaws is liable except for willful misconduct. No officer, director, or employee is liable for any action taken by him or her in good faith in an emergency in furtherance of the ordinary business affairs of the corporation even though not authorized by the bylaws then in effect.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 120, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 130, § 1.